Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2415 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In a criminal case in which the defendant is accused of an
offense involving domestic violence or abuse, evidence of the
commission of another act of domestic violence or abuse by the
defendant is admissible and may be considered for its bearing on any
matter to which it is relevant.
B. In a criminal case in which the state intends to offer
evidence under this section, the attorney for the state shall
disclose the evidence to the defendant, including statements of
witnesses or a summary of the substance of any testimony that is
expected to be offered, at least fifteen (15) days before the
commencement of trial or at such later time as the court may allow
for good cause.
C. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
limit the admission or consideration of evidence under any other
rule or provision of law.

D. For purposes of this section, "domestic violence or abuse"
means any incident of controlling, coercive, or threatening
behavior, violence, or other act of abuse against a person in a
relationship as specified in subsection C of Section 644 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes. The violence or abuse may be
psychological, physical, sexual, economic, or emotional.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4342 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4342 Page 3